Nebraska, session 109, LB1066.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1066 LB1066
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, civics assessment
means the civics portion of the United States Naturalization Test
administered by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services of
the Department of Homeland Security or an equivalent test designated by
the Secretary of State or the State Department of Education.
(2) Within ninety days after taking the oath of office, each member
of the Legislature shall complete the civics assessment. The Clerk of the
Legislature shall provide the civics assessment that includes twenty
questions randomly selected. The score shall be calculated based on the
number of correct answers out of the twenty questions selected.
(3) Completion of the assessment is required, but passage is not
required. Completion or results of the civics assessment shall not affect
the ability of any member of the Legislature to assume, hold, or continue
in office. This section shall not be construed to add to or alter the
qualifications for office established in the Constitution of Nebraska.
(4) The Clerk of the Legislature shall be the administering
authority for the civics assessment and shall certify the raw score of
each member of the Legislature to the individual member. Individual
question responses shall remain confidential.
(5) The Clerk of the Legislature shall publish the raw score of each
member on the official website of the Legislature. The score shall also
be included in the member's official public biography.
(6) Any member who does not achieve a passing score on the civics
assessment shall be invited, but not required, to attend a voluntary
civic literacy seminar conducted by the Nebraska State Historical Society
or the Legislative Research Office.
-2-